src/noun-sme-morph.txt
LEXICON SUOLULONG !!= * __@CODE@__ Long compound-forms. Inanim. Contracted 0-Nouns
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X4viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X4viđi K ;
 +N+Ess:%>X4n K ;
 +N+Ess:%>X4n%> PxC ;
 +N+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:%>X5 R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>%^DISIMP R ;
 +N:%>Y5 BOHCCO ;
 +N:%>Y6 BOHCCU ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;


!LEXICON SATTU
! +N:%>Y5 SADDO ;
! +N:%>Y6 SADDU ;
! +N:%>X4 SATTU- ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
! +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GISTTA !!= * __@CODE@__ The Noun gistta, gist -
 +N:s'ta%>X4 BOAZU-NE ;
 +N:stá%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +N:stá%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:stta DenominalAdjsV1 ;

LEXICON FALIS !!= * __@CODE@__ Contracted Anim. C-Nouns
 +N:%>X4 MALIS0 ;
 +N:%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON LASIS !!= * __@CODE@__ Contracted Inanim. C-Nouns
!Tentatively copying entries from FALIS
!This must be checked! 020207 TT.
 +N:%>X4 MALIS0 ;
! +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
! +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N:%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
 
LEXICON CEAHKES !!= * __@CODE@__ Contracted Inanim. C-Nouns
!Tentatively copying entries from FALIS
!This must be checked! 020207 TT.
 +N:es%>X4 MALIS0 ;
! +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:es%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
! +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:es%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N:is%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +N:is%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:is DenominalAdjsV1Short ;


LEXICON GUOVTTIS !!= * __@CODE@__  Collective numerals
 +v1+N+Coll+Sg+Nom:k'tis%>X4 K ;
 +v1+N+Coll+Dial/%-KJ:k'tis%>X2 MALLAS- ; !XXX tentative
 +v1+N+Coll+Ess+Dial/%-KJ:vttis%>in K ;
 +v4+N+Coll+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:vttes%> K ;
 +v4+N+Coll+Dial/%-KJ:k'tis%>X2 MALLAS- ; !XXX tentative
 +v4+N+Coll+Ess+Dial/%-KJ:vttis%>in K ;
 +v2+N+Coll+Sg+Nom:k'tis%>X4 K ;
 +v2+N+Coll+Dial/%-GG:k'tis%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +v2+N+Coll+Ess+Dial/%-KJ:vttis%>in K ;
 +v3+N+Coll+Sg+Nom+Dial/%-GG:k'tis%>Y5 K ;
 +v3+N+Coll+Dial/%-GG:k'tis%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +v3+N+Coll+Ess+Dial/%-GG:k'tis%>Y5n K ;


LEXICON GUOVTTU !!= * __@CODE@__ Here because other lexicons don't fit for it
 +N+Coll+Sg+Nom:ovtto%>s K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Dial/%-GG:kto%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:kto%> PxV2 ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Dial/%-KJ:ovtto%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:ovtto%> PxV2 ;
 +N+Coll+SgGenCmp:kto%> R ;
 +N+Coll+SgGenCmp:ovtto%> R ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Dial/%-GG:kto%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:kto%> PxV2 ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Dial/%-KJ:ovtto%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:ovtto%> PxV2 ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:ktu%>j K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:kto%>s%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Dial/%-GG:kto%>s K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:kto%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:kto%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Dial/%-KJ:ovtto%>s K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:ovtto%>s K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:ovtto%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>jn K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com:ktu%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>jn K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com:ovttu%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ess+Dial/%-KJ:ovtto%>n K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ess+Dial/%-GG:ovtto%>sin K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:kto%>t K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:ovtto%>t K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:ovttu%>jd%> Px1C ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:ktu%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Coll+PlGenCmp+Err/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Coll+PlGenCmp:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:ktu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Coll+PlGenCmp+Err/Sub:ktu%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Coll+PlGenCmp:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Err/Sub:ktu%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:ktu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Err/Sub:ktu%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>jde K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:ktu%>jdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>jde K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:ovttu%>jdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>jn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:ovttu%>js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:ovttu%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>jn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:ktu%>js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:ktu%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com/Sh:ktu%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com:ktu%>jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com/Sh:ovttu%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com:ovttu%>jd%> PxPlComC ;


LEXICON GARGIA !!= * __@CODE@__  light fin syll, bisyll. on -o- that doesn't have change o:u in front of j (i): Kino
! gen = nom ill = -i
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>i K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Com:%>in K ;
 +N+Ess:%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>id9 K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>id9 R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>id9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ide K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>igujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>i%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>sa%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Com:%>in%> PxC ;
 +N+Ess:%>n%> PxC ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:%>id%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>id%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>id%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>idas%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>in%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>id%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:%>in%> PxPlComC ;
! +N:%> DenominalNounsV ; !This is not very plausible
 +N:%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:%> DenominalAdjsV2 ;				!This is not very plausible



LEXICON BUFFALO !!= * __@CODE@__ heavy fin syll
 !gen = -a ill = -ii
 !parallel to NYSTØ
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:a%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom:a%> PxV ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> PxV ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> PxV ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:a%>sa%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n%> PxC ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:a%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jdas%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:a%>jn%> PxPlComC ;
 +N:a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible
 
LEXICON ESSAYA !!= * __@CODE@__ recent loanwords on vow+a
 +N+Sg+Nom:a%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:a%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom:a%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:a%>sa%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n%> PxC ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:a%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jdas%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:a%>jn%> PxPlComC ;
 +N:a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible

LEXICON IDEA !!= * __@CODE@__ restricted Px for speller recent loanwords on vow+a
 +N+Sg+Nom:a%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:a%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/-Spell:a%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:a%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/-Spell:a%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:a%>sa%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/-Spell:a%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/-Spell:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Ess+Use/-Spell:a%>n%> PxC ;
! +N+Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:a%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/-Spell:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/-Spell:a%>jdas%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/-Spell:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/-Spell:a%>jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:a%>jn%> PxPlComC ;
 +N:a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible


LEXICON MASAI !!= * __@CODE@__ heavy fin syll
 !gen = -a ill = -ii
 !parallel to NYSTØ
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%> R ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:a%>sa%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n%> PxC ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:a%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jdas%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Sub:a%>jn%> PxPlComC ;
 +N:a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible


LEXICON STRUKTUR !!= * __@CODE@__ Recent loanwords on -vra with short cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:r%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:v'ra%> R ;	!
 +N+Sg+Nom:v'ra%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:v'ra%> Px3V ;
 +N:v'ra%> EssV ;
 +N:v'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:v'ra%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:v'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:v'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:v'ra DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON KULTUR
 +N+SgNomCmp:ur%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:tor%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:uv'ra%> R ;	!
 +N+Sg+Nom:uv'ra%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:uv'ra%> Px3V ;
 +N:uv'ra%> EssV ;
 +N:uv'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:uv'ra%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:uv'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:uv'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:uv'ra DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON KANTUR !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +v7+Use/NG:konttor GAHPIR ;
 +v4+Use/NG:kontor GAHPIR ;
 +v5+Use/NG:gánttor GAHPIR ;
 +v6+Use/NG:gántor GAHPIR ;
 +v2+N+Sg+Nom:kontuv'ra%> K ;
 +v1+N+Sg+Nom:kantuv'ra%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:kontuv'ra%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:kánttor%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:kántur%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:kántor%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:gántur%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:kantuv'ra%> R ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:kantuv'ra%> Px3V ;
 +v1+N:kantuv'ra%> EssV ;
 +v1+N:kantuv'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
 +v1+N:kantuv'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +v1+N:kantuv'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +v1+N:kantuv'ra DenominalNounsV ;
 +v2+N+Sg+Nom:kontuv'ra%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:kontuv'ra%> Px3V ;
 +v2+N:kontuv'ra%> EssV ;
 +v2+N:kontuv'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
 +v2+N:kontuv'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +v2+N:kontuv'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +v2+N:kontuv'ra DenominalNounsV ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:gántuv'ra%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:gántuv'ra%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:gántuv'ra%> Px3V ;
 +v3+N:gántuv'ra%> EssV ;
 +v3+N:gántuv'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
 +v3+N:gántuv'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +v3+N:gántuv'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +v3+N:gántuv'ra DenominalNounsV ;
